Rhode Island statutes. Title 37 Public Property and Works
Chapter 3.2 Quonset Point Naval Air Station Property Lease

37-3.2-1.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, the following words and phrases shall have the following meanings unless the context shall indicate another or different meaning or intent:

“Quonset Point buildings” means the buildings at the site of Quonset Point naval air station in the town of North Kingstown and situated on the reverter real property, or the surplus real property, including, without being limited to, the following: buildings number 1, 2, 16, 17, 60, 151, 374, 375, 406, 483, 484, 488, 536, 537, DG12 and DT38.

“Reverter real property” means that real property more fully described in P.L. 1939, ch. 696, together with all later additions or accretions thereto resulting from filling in or otherwise, title to which has reverted or will revert to the state pursuant to the provisions of P.L. 1939, ch. 696.

“Reverter personal property” means the personal property (which may include any of the Quonset Point buildings to the extent that they are deemed to be personal property) located on the reverter real property.

“Surplus real property” means such real property as shall be transferred, assigned, or conveyed to the state by the United States pursuant to the provisions of § 13 (g) of the surplus property act of 1944, 50 U.S.C. App. § 1622 (g), or pursuant to the provisions of any other applicable law of the United States.

“Surplus personal property” means such personal property, in addition to the reverter personal property, as shall be transferred, assigned, or conveyed to the state by the United States pursuant to the provisions of § 13 (g) of the surplus property act of 1944 or pursuant to the provisions of any other applicable law of the United States.

History of Section.

P.L. 1975, ch. 249, § 1.

37-3.2-2.
Acquisition of title to property.

Notwithstanding any special or general law to the contrary, the governor is authorized, empowered, and directed, with the approval of the state properties committee, to acquire, in the name of the state of Rhode Island, from the United States, title to the reverter personal property, the surplus real property, the surplus personal property, and the real and personal property located at the naval construction battalion center in the village of Davisville, town of North Kingstown, and the real and personal property located at the naval complex in the county of Newport.

History of Section.

P.L. 1975, ch. 249, § 1.

37-3.2-3.
Lease of property.

The governor is authorized, empowered, and directed, with the approval of the state properties committee to enter into an agreement or agreements to lease, and then to lease, not more than approximately one hundred seventy-five (175) acres of land comprising part of the reverter real property and part of the surplus real property, together with the Quonset Point buildings and all other improvements on the real property, and any of the reverter personal property and the surplus personal property located on the real property or in those buildings or related to the use and occupation thereof, to electric boat division of general dynamics corporation, a Delaware corporation, for an initial term and one or more renewal terms not exceeding, in the aggregate, thirty (30) years and for rents and upon other terms, conditions, and agreements, including provisions with respect to arbitration of disputes, for other consideration, and with powers to assign, mortgage, or otherwise dispose of the leasehold estate, as the governor and the state properties committee shall approve.

If the Rhode Island economic development corporation, or any subsidiary corporation thereof, (the same being hereinafter referred to as “the corporation”) shall acquire title to any of the reverter real property, the reverter personal property, the surplus real property, the surplus personal property, or any other personal property, then, to that extent, the corporation shall be authorized and empowered, with the approval of the state properties committee, to enter into an agreement or agreements to lease, and then to lease (or, as to Rhode Island port authority and economic development corporation, to sublease through any subsidiary corporation thereof) not more than approximately one hundred seventy-five (175) acres of the land comprising part of the reverter real property and part of the surplus real property, together with the Quonset Point buildings and all other improvements on that real property, and any of the reverter personal property and the surplus personal property located on the real property or in the buildings or related to the use and occupation thereof, and any other personal property which it may acquire, to electric boat division of general dynamics corporation, a Delaware corporation, for an initial term and one or more renewal terms not exceeding, in the aggregate, thirty (30) years and for rents and upon other terms, conditions, and agreements, for other consideration, and with such powers to assign, mortgage, or otherwise dispose of the leasehold estate, as the corporation and the state properties committee shall approve.

History of Section.

P.L. 1975, ch. 249, § 1; P.L. 1976, ch. 277, § 8.

37-3.2-4.
Management of leased property.

If the governor shall enter into an agreement or agreements to lease, or a lease, with electric boat division of general dynamics corporation, a Delaware corporation, pursuant to the authority hereinbefore conferred upon him or her, he or she shall further be authorized and empowered, with the approval of the state properties committee, to engage the Rhode Island economic development corporation, or any subsidiary corporation thereof, to manage for and on behalf of the state any property which shall be subject to an agreement or agreements to lease, or a lease, and, as agent of the state, to discharge the state’s responsibilities under that agreement or lease and exercise all authorities conferred upon the state thereby, upon the terms and conditions as the governor and the state properties committee shall approve.

History of Section.

P.L. 1975, ch. 249, § 1.

37-3.2-5.
Transfer of property.

The governor is authorized, empowered, and directed, with the approval of the state properties committee, to transfer, assign, and convey to the Rhode Island economic development corporation, or any subsidiary corporation thereof, any part or all of the property which is subject to an agreement or agreements to lease, or a lease, or which is intended to be subject to an agreement, agreements, or lease, all in accordance with the provisions of this chapter, upon such terms and conditions, and for such consideration, as the governor and the state properties committee shall approve, the property thereafter to be used or disposed of by the corporation in accordance with the provisions of this chapter and its corporate purposes. The authority herein granted to the governor shall be in addition to any other authority conferred upon him or her by law.

History of Section.

P.L. 1975, ch. 249, § 1.

37-3.2-6.
State authorized to sue or be sued.

The state is authorized to sue, and consents to be sued, in its own name in connection with any of the foregoing.

History of Section.

P.L. 1975, ch. 249, § 1.

37-3.2-7.
Certain prior transactions ratified.

The execution and delivery by the governor, with the approval of the state properties committee, of a certain “instrument of severance and transfer of interests” dated November 11, 1975, and the execution and delivery by Quonset Point land corporation, a subsidiary public corporation of the Rhode Island economic development corporation, of a certain “instrument of severance” dated November 14, 1976, is hereby approved, ratified, and confirmed in all respects.

History of Section.

P.L. 1976, ch. 277, § 9; P.L. 1977, ch. 115, § 1.